Authors
Craig Good
Number of Reviews
51

Title
Review for Sign o' the Times (1987)
     SIGN O' THE TIMES, the new concert film from Prince, has so much energy
that I'm surprised it can be screened in California without violating Nuclear
Free Zone ordinances.  I'm not a Prince fan per se, (I liked PURPLE RAIN but
avoided UNDER THE CHERRY MOON), and I don't often like what he's saying, but I
have to admit the kid knows how to put on a show.  His story instincts are good
enough to have provided the barest thread of a story line to hold the film
together and prevent it from being just a random collection of songs.
     The Revolution has regrouped and recouped since Wendy and Lisa left, and
the new band is at least as good as it ever was.  Whatever they did to keep up
the pace, I hope it was legal.  The production values of the film are very
high.  It was mildly disappointing that "U Got The Look" was printed up from
video -- I guess they did the post-production for that one on tape.  Everything
else is well-photographed in 35mm and tightly edited.
     Prince has to be one of the most inconsistent song writers in the
business.  His lyrics range from the near-brilliant ("Sign O' The Times") to
sheer dreck ("U Got The Look").  But I've been somewhat fascinated for a while
with Prince's aesthetic.  Look at the members of his band individually and you
see a motley collection of Halloween dropouts.  Look at his band as a group and
somehow it all fits together.  Maybe it's because they all wear more attitude
than clothing.  I don't get it, but I kinda like it.
     I also kinda like his taste in women.  Okay, okay.  I'm only human.  Don't
ask me why, but I get a kick out of Cat (Yes, Cat.  At least Prince is out of
"V" names for his protegees) and her high-frequency gyrations.  The big drum
solo by Sheila E may well be worth the price of admission.  Her rap lick near
the end of the film is an impressive demonstration of her near-perfect sense of
rhythm.  All of her stickwork proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that the lady
knows her way around a drum set.  Not bad, as the icon-laden minstrel himself
says, for a girl.
     SIGN O' THE TIMES is, as I'm about to say, not bad for a concert film.  If
you don't enjoy yourself it's probably because Prince is just plain not your
cup of tea.
[And congrats from the moderator of r.a.m.r. to Craig for having his name in the
credits of *two* of the films in the 20TH INTERNATIONAL TOURNEE OF ANIMATION.
-ecl]


Title
Review for Running Man, The (1987)
     In a future somewhere between MAX HEADROOM and ROBOCOP, the number-one
television show is a gladiator fest where the contestants (read "victims") are
convicted criminals.  Arnold Schwarzenegger plays a cop who refuses to gun down
unarmed citizens in a food riot and winds up in a labor camp, framed as "The
Butcher of Bakersfield."
     After a prison break and arrest, he becomes the featured player on Richard
Dawson's RUNNING MAN show.  Ratings go up as bad guys go down.  One after
another, government gladiators go after Arnie in the large game area, and one
after another he dispatches them.  So far I've told you nothing you couldn't
learn from the trailer, and that's the problem with the movie.
     THE RUNNING MAN is a film with motion-picture ideas and television
sensibilities.  Director Paul Michael Glaser, formerly of Starsky and Hutch
fame, delivers numbingly endless action sequences and no direction for Arnold.
I've maintained for a few years that Schwarzenegger is underrated as an actor.
To continue making that argument I'm afraid I'll have to ignore this particular
data point.  The man does have talent, but he needs a decent script and a
little help from the director or he comes off as a muscled mannequin.
     I can't totally pan the movie because it does have its moments.  For a
while I thought it would approach ROBOCOP's humor.  Soon, though, the formula
of setup/action/wisecrack wears real thin.  The most redeeming feature (aside
from some deftly-handled visual effects by SFX) is the treatment of editing for
TV "news."  I can only hope that after seeing THE RUNNING MAN the audience
approaches everything they hear and see from the "news" media with renewed
suspicion.  I just suspect that the audience will be rather small, and more
interested in the action than the story.  But, so was the director.

Title
Review for Copycat (1995)
     I had a conversation with a sagacious friend at work last week
about the current rash of serial killer movies.  Naturally the subject
turned to SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.   Here we had a movie which was a
critical and box office smash.  As my friend Jeff noted, Hollywood
loves to copy a success, but they often copy the wrong thing.  Some
collection of empty suits evidently thought that SILENCE succeeded
because it had serial killers.  They were wrong.  It succeeded because
it had well drawn characters who had an interesting relationship, and
because the movie generated genuine tension in the audience.  Enter the
ironically named COPYCAT.
     COPYCAT fails completely as a thriller.  It did not raise my pulse
once.  Aside from the odd "boo!," I sat unmoved.  There were a few
character moments, and one good line ("Helen!  I seem to have cured
your agoraphobia!").  And I'll admit that there wasn't much that I
actively disliked about the film.  But neither did it do much to win me
over.  All in all it played about like an old "NBC Mystery Movie"
except with blood, profanity and naked corpses. (I may be doing
injustice to the old TV show.  Most episodes of "Columbo" were much
more satisfying.)
     The only real surprise in the film was the way one character was
killed off.  The surprise came entirely from the staging and from the
fact that it was completely pointless.  He wasn't even killed by the
serial killer, but rather by some random tertiary character introduced
out of nowhere to play just this one scene.  I rather suspect that the
screenwriter just didn't want to have to deal with him at the end of
the movie.  Or maybe it was just another in a succession of cheap
thrills.
     I, for one, am looking forward to the end of the current fad of
cinema sadism.  While we wait for the boardroom brain trust in
Hollywood to start copying the wrong thing from some other hit movie,
we can at least cast a tiny vote for originality by spending our $7.00
on something other than COPYCAT.

Title
Review for For All Mankind (1989)
     FOR ALL MANKIND is the kind of disc that makes you glad you own a
laserdisc player.  It is currently available only on disc.  The director, Al
Reinert, hopes this leverages into a theatrical release which would be followed
by a release on VHS.  It is the story of the decade-long Apollo program, told
in the words of the astronauts themselves and with the movies they shot in
space.  It captures and recreates the excitement I felt back when it was
happening.
     Using interviews taped starting in 1976, Reinert lets these "original
extra-terrestrial humans" narrate a composite mission made up of footage from
all the Apollo flights.  He spent years in NASA's vaults gleaning some of the
best of their copious 16mm footage.  These shots, some of which have never been
seen outside of NASA, were carefully enlarged to 35mm.  The whole thing is
backed up by a wonderful Brian Eno score.
     The awesome launch of a Saturn V, the beautiful violence of stage
separation, and the views of the Earth from the Moon which changed forever our
perception of our world are here in all their glory.  The superhuman astronauts
listen to Country Western and Frank Sinatra, make home movies and play with
their food while traveling farther than any before them.  This is an intimate,
first-hand account of one of man's greatest technological feats.
     The CAV version of the disc includes a generous "still gallery" at the end
of each side which includes each mission logo, and a photograph of each crew.
The entire fourth side is supplemental material covering each mission, where
each astronaut is today, the beautiful paintings of Al Bean, and selections
from pioneering fiction films about travel to the moon.  The analog audio track
includes a commentary by Reinert on the making of the film.
     If you have a player, this is one worth owning.  If you don't yet own a
player, perhaps this will convince you to buy one.  If you see this title in
the theatre some day be sure to see it.  FOR ALL MANKIND is an energizing and
uplifting labor of love.  I'm glad Al Reinert made it.

Title
Review for Event Horizon (1997)
"Event Horizon" manages to raise the notion of "preposterous" to new
heights.
What starts out as a promising premise, that of a derelict space ship
on the edge of the solar system which has returned as a ghost ship from
parts unknown, degenerates into an incomprehensible mess.
A rescue team led by Larry Fishburne is joined by the nightmare-prone
scientist, Sam Neil, on a mission to rescue the Event Horizon and any
surviving crew. For seven years the ship had been Somewhere, after
trying out a new gravity drive which is supposed to use loopholes in
relativity for effectively faster than light travel.
The ship seems to have been to hell and back, literally, and is now a
flying haunted mansion that evokes nightmarish visions of hell in the
rescue crew. All of that sounds like it should work. It doesn't.
The dialogue is by turns forced, silly, on the nose, or pure
exposition. The plot devices have blinking red lights on them so you
can't miss them. The "science" in this science fiction film is
annoyingly stupid. (How about a guy in a space suit, floating outside a
window, yelling and being heard from inside?)
The movie is nearly devoid of content and has to rely on cheap tricks
in an attempt to startle the audience. Laughably loud edits and buckets
of fake blood are but desperate band-aids over the holes through which
air from the theatre is rushing in to fill the void. I got the
impression more than once that it was made by people who as children
stuck their friends' hands in buckets of cold spaghetti and peeled
grapes on Halloween.
Here is your official "Event Horizon" sound designer guide:
As a fitting finish, the closing credits run over something that was no
doubt performed by people who would describe themselves as musicians,
but who managed only to produce an unpleasent noise apparently designed
to drive the remaining stragglers from the theatre.
Somone in the parking lot elevator after the movie said, "Maybe we
should have seen 'George of the Jungle' instead."

Title
Review for Broadcast News (1987)
     Let me blurt it right out:  BROADCAST NEWS is one of the best films of the
year.  It's common for the studios to hold their Oscar hopefuls for Christmas.
We should be hearing about this film again in February.
     The cast is fabulous.  Albert Brooks gets most of the film's many funny
lines and delivers a poignant performance as the well-educated reporter who
just can't make it on camera.  William Hurt shows yet another facet of his
talent by playing the well-meaning but shallow sportscaster who is hurtled
toward the anchor desk by sheer dint of good looks.  He's not really an
airhead, but he is, as we say in the trade, just a little behind the audience.
My favorite discovery was Holly Hunter (if she isn't nominated then the Academy
has less soul than even I suspect).  As the obsessive-compulsive news producer
she dominates the film while she tries to dominate her job.  There is also what
amounts to a wonderful cameo by a well-known actor, but I don't want to spoil
it for you.  You'll know what I mean when you see the film.
     The intelligent script is fairly littered with gems.  I heard so many good
lines, many of them in background conversation, that I can't begin to remember
them all.  It makes me want to rent it on video and sit down with a note pad
and a remote control.  As the story is told of the developing love triangle all
three characters are brought out as sympathetic, breathing human beings.  We
wind up liking them each so much that we don't want any of them to be hurt.
But the bittersweet nature of the comedy starts to appear near the end when we
realize that in a triangle *somebody* has to lose.  The ending surprised me and
may disappoint some, but rings very true.
     BROADCAST NEWS is refreshingly well-researched.  Everything about the
frenetic, neurotic nature of television is right on the money.  Most people
will probably think that it was all exaggerated for the movie.  I hope at least
that they learn something about what goes on behind the little glass screen.
But don't go just to get educated.  Go to enjoy yourself.

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
        I bravely predict that Lisa Kudrow and Mira Sorvino will be completely
overlooked come Oscar time since the Academy still seems to think that there's
something easy about doing comedy. Perhaps it's because once in a while
someone like Kudrow or Sorvino will come along and make it look so easy. In
"Romy and Michele's High School Reunion" their performances are a reminder
that at least half of story telling is in the telling -- it's not just the
script.
        The script by Robin Schiff is good, and it is funny, but the story
itself doesn't break particularly new ground. Which doesn't matter a whit
because it *is* funny, and the film *is* good. Sorvino and Kudrow turn in
performances which accomplish something rare: they give a real depth and
humanity to a couple of shallow people. They are also funny and fun
to watch. (Any red--blooded male could be entirely forgiven for becoming
obsessed with Mira Sorvino's mouth after watching her talk for a while.)
        On the surface, Romy and Michele are none too bright. They haven't
managed to do anything impressive in ten years after high school except
bond in a vital friendship. Their joy is positively contagious as they
continue to find the things they have in common. Every time they give each
other that "Wow, you *too*?" look it's a moment of discovery for them. That
these things are all completely banal is beside the point. The basic arc of
the story, that they fight and then rediscover their friendship, is easy
to see coming. What's pleasantly unpredictable is just what these two are
going to do or say next. It's pleasant mostly because just about everything
they say or do is funny.
        Speaking of good work likely to be overlooked, this movie happens
to have some of the most subtile effects makeup work I've ever seen. There
is some good age makeup in a dream sequence but (and I'm being vague so as
not to spoil anything) check out the character in the limo who says he has
had plastic surgery. Now that is really nice work.
        Back to the movie. Another fun performance to watch is that of
Janeane Garofalo as the uptight and in a rush woman with a chip on her
shoulder the size of Montana. And aside from the romantic frustrations she
suffered in high school the best I can figure is that she's just angry because
she has such a big chip on her shoulder.
        Walking home from the theatre I could overhear the conversation
of a couple of young teen girls who were busily analyzing Romy and Michele's
clothes and hair in each sequence of the movie. I'd bet folding money that
neither of them realized how much they sounded just like Romy and Michele.
They reminded me that no matter how far off the wall they got (which is
pretty darn far by the end of the reunion) Romy and Michele were in the
end bright, likeable and most of all, human. If you're looking for a fun
time at the movies you could do a lot worse.

Title
Review for Elvira, Mistress of the Dark (1988)
     I like bad films.  Rather, I like the genre known as "badfilm."  You know,
the kind of movies Eddie Wood made, like PLAN 9 FROM OUTER SPACE and GLEN OR
GLENDA.  Or movies like Eddie's disciples made, like ORGY OF THE DEAD.  You
know.  The kind of films Elvira, Mistress of the Dark often runs on her
television show.  But not, it appears, the kind of movie in which she is
currently starring.
     Cassandra Petersen has a good flair for comedy.  She also has big boobs
and great legs.  She combined those assets with a black wig (she's naturally
blonde, don'tcha know) and a low-cut dress to create her famous late-night
horror hostess character.  In that role she provides a lot of campy fun as she
pokes fun at some wretched films and at herself.  She made me a fan, or at
least got me to go see her movie.
     I can't honestly say I had high hopes for ELVIRA, but gosh, it *was* at
least co-written by Petersen and fellow Groundling John Paragon.  Maybe it was
a better movie than I thought.  Perhaps I have too low a tolerance for low-brow
double entendre.  Perhaps I should be able to enjoy ninety minutes of breast
jokes.  I probably shouldn't have been thinking thoughts like: "Why does she do
*that* and then complain when male characters come on to her?".  Maybe I
shouldn't have let my mind wander off to "Gee...  'puerile' and 'juvenile'
rhyme, sorta."  But maybe, just maybe, the film should have been better.
     I mean, it's not *all* bad.  There are a few very funny bits (including a
game show version of reading a will and a wonderful, if late, sendup of
FLASHDANCE) floating in this misguided morass of celluloid.  The director,
whose name I have mercifully forgotten, never gets the movie on track.  The
humor is all forced, and apparently aimed at the lowest common denominator
among fourteen-year-olds.  In those few cases where the movie works it appears
to be by accident.
     ELVIRA is not "badfilm."  It doesn't try so hard to be good that it gets
so bad that it's good again.  It doesn't know what it wants to be and, as a
result, isn't much of anything.  ELVIRA may have big boobs, but the really big
boobs are people like me who paid $5.50 to see it.

Title
Review for Someone to Watch Over Me (1987)
     I'm sorry I waited this long to see SOMEONE TO WATCH OVER ME.  It's still
in first run in some cities, so it's not too late for you.  When Ridley Scott
makes a movie you *know* that it's going to look good.  The man is simply magic
with a camera.  I could go on and on about the rich atmosphere and stunning
low-key cinematography.  After ALIEN, BLADE RUNNER, and LEGEND he was worried
about being type-cast as a fantasy film maker.  With SOMEONE TO WATCH OVER ME
he tells the story of a New York detective assigned to protect a socialite
murder witness.
     The story of the killer and his attempts to silence the rich woman is just
a foundation for the real story.  It is a story about consequences.  The cop is
happily married and in love with his wife.  He and the socialite, fatigued and
frightened, fall for each other.  The movie deals with what happens to them and
to the detective's wife and family, skillfully interwoven with the thriller
material.  The combination yields a rich film that, like BLADE RUNNER, I like
better the more I think about it.
     A few years ago I saw another movie with adultery as a central element,
UNTIL SEPTEMBER.  It's the only film I've ever seen that made me angry.  I was
furious with the story because, worse than ignoring consequences, it perverted
them.  A truth about the human condition is that our decisions and actions have
effects.  In UNTIL SEPTEMBER only the innocent were hurt, and the adulterous
couple breezed through the film making French toast and sniffing each other's
armpits.  A refreshing contrast, SOMEONE TO WATCH OVER ME not only illustrates
how it could happen, but documents the anguish and heartache of all the
participants.  It is truly what I call an adult film.  See it while you can
enjoy it on the big screen.

Title
Review for Mask, The (1994)
     THE MASK just burst onto summer screens.  It will be interesting
to watch and see how it does at the box office.  From me it gets a
mixed, if mostly positive, review.  The film has many assets, and not a
few liabilities.
     The production had the guts to go with the grotesque design of the
character itself, and I can't help but wonder how many people will want
to see a whole movie with *that* face in it.  On the other hand, the
movie is clearly at its best when the mask is on.  When it comes off,
the energy drops and the audience has time to fidget and notice the
frayed curtains around the stage.  When it goes back on, hot dang.
Nobody notices anything except the great gags on the screen.  Some of
them are so well timed as to pull most of their humor from the basic
element of comedy, and others are simply audaciously funny.
     Star Jim Carrey is himself a mixed blessing.  His gift for broad
physical comedy serves him well when he is The Mask, but in his Dr.
Jekyll state it's obvious that, as nice a guy as he is, he just can't
act his way out of a wet paper bag.  I mean, watch him try to be
sincere and *then* come tell me how bad Keanu Reeves is.  A pleasant
surprise is the actress who plays the bombshell (I'm sorry I didn't
catch her name in the credits, but I expect we'll all know it after
this movie).  She acts rings around Carrey (no big deal) and manages to
project some charm through her ho-hum role.  And that's the trouble
with all of the other characters--they're just not interesting.  The
simpleton sidekick to the detective is a bright spot, but for the most
part we just want Jim to put the mask back on so we don't have to spend
more time with these people.
     The film's greatest assets are the art direction and the stunning
effects.  THE MASK paints the frame in solid, comic book colors and
strong graphic shapes.  It almost looks as though someone dipped DICK
TRACY in a little of THE CROW.  Both the design and, more importantly,
the animation of the cartoony transformations are top notch.  On the
downside, the film wants to pay homage to Tex Avery, but doesn't quite
understand how.  When The Mask becomes the Tex Avery wolf who used to
pop his cork at the Preston Blair girl, he's not staged in profile.
Instead, he's seen three-quarter view and in a darkly-lit setting.
This robs an otherwise flawless 3D adaptation of the graphic impact
Avery had in his films.  (My animation bias isn't showing, is it?)
     The story is also a mixed bag.  Many aspects of how the mask works
and how it changes the life of a spineless bank clerk are addressed in
a solid and entertaining manner.  Other basic questions are just
ignored.  The spine of the story contains no real surprises, although I
have to admit that a lot of things happen which I just did not see
coming.  Any sort of a surprise in a fluffy summer film is a pleasant
one as far as I'm concerned.
     So, if you've already seen TRUE LIES, wander on down to the
theatre.  Try to see THE MASK in a good one: the sound effects editor
had the best sense of timing and one of the best senses of humor of
anybody involved in the project.

Title
Review for English Patient, The (1996)
If a better movie comes out this year, I'd sure like to see it.
"The English Patient" is a gripping, complex, emotional and surprizing
movie.  It is in many ways (all of them good) a very old-fashioned
film, and yet it is fresh and lacking even a hint of cliche. Every time
I tried to predict what a character was going to do, or which character
was going to fall in love with whom, I was wrong. And I'm rarely so
happy to be proven wrong so many times in one day.
This is, in a way, a difficult movie to review. On the one hand it
could leave me gasping for appropriate adjectives. On the other, I'd
hate to spoil even one moment of discovery for those going to see it.
Forgive me if I write in generalities.
The script is truly a thing of beauty. Each character is a living,
breathing individual. I was particularly fascinated with Ralph Fienes'
character: I spent the movie not knowing if I should admire him, hate
him or pity him. At the end I realized that he had too many dimensions
to allow such pidgeon-holing. Calling this simply a "love story" would
be like calling a computer an adding machine. It deals with attraction,
lust, obsession, betrayal, self-destruction, honor, revenge, mercy,
anger, art and pity. Oh, forget it. I can't make a complete list, nor
should I try. As David Lynch said, "If you can talk about it you aren't
using cinema".
Everything about the production is finely crafted. The cinematography
of Italy and Tunesia is gorgeous. The music is perfect. The audio mix
is the kind of genius you expect with Walter Murch on the project. It
is clearly evident that everybody working on the film knew they had
something here which was special; in which they could take pride. This
is the kind of movie wich makes me glad that movies were invented. It's
ample balm for the summer bombs we sat through.
If we don't hear the title "The English Patient" a *lot* at Oscar time,
the Academy should be dropped in the desert and abandoned.

Title
Review for Brazil (1985)
     I know it's out of the ordinary to have a book review in this newsgroup.
THE BATTLE OF BRAZIL, Jack Mathews's book about Terry Gilliam's struggle with
Hollywood to release his film, is an extraordinary book.  It chronicles in
frightening detail what it is like to deal with the big studio system and how,
just this once, the Director won.
     Life imitated art when Gilliam's masterpiece of fantasy and dehumanizing
bureaucracy fell into the fell clutches of a lawyer cum studio exec, Sid
Sheinberg (Hint: It was Sheinberg's idea to replace the symphonic Jerry
Goldsmith score for LEGEND with syntho-pop Tangerine Dream music).  There it
sat at Universal, perhaps the most Orwellian, overgrown, Big Hollywood Studio
of them all, and they didn't know what to do with it.
     What they tried (and almost succeeded) to do with it was turn BRAZIL into
a confused, bland, happy-ending romantic comedy.  One of the best features of
the book is a complete, annotated script.  Many of the notes explain what
changes were made for the Universal version.  Chilling.  Absolutely chilling.
Illustrative are a few of the alternate titles sent by Universal to Gilliam
(who figured they must have a drawer of unused movie titles somewhere).  I'm
not making these up, and they're all at least this bad:
     This constitutes the best evidence I've ever seen for rampant drug abuse
in Hollywood.  Film buffs and people who appreciate Gilliam's brilliant vision
will devour THE BATTLE OF BRAZIL with a passion.  And it even has a happy
ending.

Title
Review for Working Girl (1988)
     Melanie Griffith's name should finally become a household word after her
performance in WORKING GIRL.  Stealing the show from the likes of Sigourney
Weaver and Harrison Ford is no mean feat.  All three turn in impressive
performances in roles which must have been fun for them to play.
     Griffith is a secretary with brains and ambition.  Her new boss at the
investment company is Weaver as a self-centered, unscrupulous, climber of the
corporate ladder.  Weaver's character is written so on-the-edge that it would
have been an unconvincing cartoon in the hands of a lesser actress.  Sigourney
plays it to the hilt, and eventually convinces us that such a jerk could
actually exist.  This is the second time this year she's excelled in the role
of a difficult, unlikable woman (the first playing Dian Fossey in GORILLAS IN
THE MIST).
     Harrison Ford does his usual top-notch job in a supporting role as a
financier who drinks too much but manages to perform reasonably well at work
anyway.  When Griffith gets a chance to put together a deal, by pretending not
to be a lowly secretary, she needs his help.  Naturally, he falls for her.  And
why not?  As she succinctly describes herself while under the influence of
valium and tequila, "I've got a head for business and a bod for sin."
     The thing I liked most about Griffith and her character was being reminded
what a turn-on brains can be.  After so many films and so many bimbos it's
wonderful to see a gutsy, intelligent woman.  She's not superwoman, mind you,
and is perfectly capable of making mistakes.  But you get the real impression
that she learns from them, too.  She is constantly making choices: between
failure and the failure to take risks, and between a man who buys her underwear
and one who buys her a briefcase.  She progresses rapidly, like a scrappy,
savvy woman.  Even her goofy, comic-relief friend (Joan Cusak, delightful as
ever) is no airhead.
     In the final analysis, WORKING GIRL is an old-fashioned romantic comedy.
It now seems like daring, hang-ten film making to take the kind of risks this
film does, but once upon a time many movies were like that.  I felt almost
guilty enjoying an honest-to-gosh happy ending, where work and adventure are
rewarded, and avarice and dishonesty fall to satisfying retribution.  Having
said all that, perhaps I should have simply noted that WORKING GIRL is on my
Top Ten list for 1988 and said "check it out."

Title
Review for Cutthroat Island (1995)
So Jeff and I got to the crummy local 15-plex just a few minutes too
late to see "Sense and Sensibility" on Saturday.  The logical
alternative was to see "Cutthroat Island" instead. Right?  It turned
out not to be such a bad choice.
I'm not going to try to tell you that this is great cinema. It's not
going to make many top ten lists, and even this year I don't see it
grabbing a nomination for Best Picture of the Year. But was it fun?
Yup.
>From the first stunt set piece, where Geena Davis the pirate (if you
can't suspend that particular disbelief long enough for her to convince
you, don't bother going any further) plunges toward the ocean floor to
cut her father loose from the anchor which is pulling them both below
the waves, I began to make mental comparisons to "Goldeneye". I thought
that if that incomprehensibly dull Bond film had had one or two gags
that good, it would not have been such a disappointment. But the scale
and outrageousness of the gags in "Cutthroat Island" do nothing but
build from there, all the way to the explosive finale.
This is a pirate film which aims to please and, for the most part,
delivers.  Nobody said "Arrrgh, Matey" nor "keelhaul", but peg legs,
plank-walking, cannon fire and sabre duels are delivered by the
galleon. It may be obvious to point out that this is not a
finely-crafted character piece. Director Renny Harlin instead paints
with broad, bold strokes which are more often than not perfectly
appropriate. I mean, why have a boring establishing shot when you have
a good helicopter camera rig close at hand?
The dialogue doesn't so much sparkle as fizzle most of the time, with
occasional and worthwhile exceptions where it blazes. But the action,
gorgeous locations, and and production design deliver in such
outrageous proportions that it is possible to forgive many weaknesses.
Were I a pyro/FX man on this picture, I would have left the set every
night saying, "Man, I love my job". It's not just scale which makes it
work, although heaven knows this is huge, but the playful imagination
which went into nearly every setup. Call me perverse, but I found
poetry in the way giant cannons were catapulted through the air during
the point-blank sea battle. And Geena Davis' stunts (aided, no doubt,
by digital wire removal) were often *literally* over the top.
If you found this year's Bond flaccid and still hunger for a fun romp,
perhaps the turgor of Geena Davis will sate that appetite. It's no
"Citizen Kane", but in the end, "Cutthroat Island" delivered everything
I wanted but never got from "Goldeneye".

Title
Review for Rampo (1994)
"If I could say it, I wouldn't have to dance it." -- Isadora Duncan
"If you can talk about it, you're not using cinema." -- David Lynch
Authors, at least the good ones, sometimes have the experience of
watching their characters come to life. They stop being words on a page
and start dictating their own lines and actions. For Rampo Edogawa in
"The Mystery of Rampo" this comes literally true. His novel of a young
wife killing her husband is banned by the government censors, and then
he sees a newspaper account of an identical killing. More, when he goes
to spy out the woman, she looks exactly like the character he
visualized in his book. As he is drawn toward her the line between fact
and fantasy, between dreams and reality, bends, blurs and then
shatters.
"Rampo" is a hard movie to pidgeonhole, which is its greatest strength.
It's not "Carlos Saura's Carmen" meets "The Twilight Zone", and it's
not really what would happen if David Lynch had been born Japanese. It
does have a palpable and convincing dreamlike quality mixed with linear
storytelling.
I'm a sucker for films which blur the dream line such as "The Last
Wave", "Altered States" and "Carlos Saura's Carmen". But I don't know
if I should really review this movie because it touched me at such a
deeply personal level that to learn that others see it differently
might make me feel that I have exposed something too private.
For one thing, the woman in the film, played by former model Michiko
Hada, is so beautiful that she literally wrung tears from my eyes. It
wasn't until the morning after I saw the movie that I recognized the
emotion. They were exactly the same tears I cried when looking at the
sculpture of an incosolable woman on a tomb in Florence, Italy. The
deep, anguished sadness and sense of loss on that perfect marble face
generated in me one of the most powerful experiences I have ever had
while beholding a work of art. And here was a walking, breathing figure
equally as beautiful and touching -- at least to me.
For another, the film is so *cinematic* that to try to write about it
seems as futile as trying to photograph the Grand Canyon. "The Mystery
of Rampo" is filmed poetry. It operates at an emotional level which
makes a strong undercurrent beneath the surface story. It is visually
rich and unusually crafted, carried along in a torrent of excellent
sound design and Akira Senju's lush, romantic symphonic score.
The performances by Naoto Takenaka as Rampo, Masahiro Motoki as his
detective alter ego, and Michiko Hada as Shizuku the mysterious woman
who may be a murderer, a victim, or merely a figment of the
imagination, are all subtle and heart felt. Takenaka's smooth baritone
in effect harmonizes beautifully with the flower-delicate voice of Hada
as each character seems weighed down and crushed by every external
force in their lives except each other.  The resignation of Rampo after
being rebuffed by the censor and then having to go to a superficial
party to celebrate one of his mystery novels being turned into a B
action movie reads in every quiet gesture. And Shizuku needs merely
cast an empty gaze at the floor to convey her sadness. The magnetism
drawing their characters together may be obsession, salvation,
destruction, or all three.
"The Mystery of Rampo" is a strange movie, no doubt about it. It is
unlikely to appeal to those who think that "Twister" is destined to be
the best movie of the year. But if you're inclined to seek out
something a little different, I think you could do far worse. I have no
idea if it got any theatrical distribution in the US in 1994, but it is
at least available now on laserdisc.

Title
Review for Full Metal Jacket (1987)
     Stanly Kubrick hasn't made a movie since THE SHINING, making FULL METAL
JACKET one of the most anticipated films of the year.  It would be a mistake to
call it a "me too" follow-up to PLATOON, but comparisons between the two films
are going to be unavoidable.  What they share in common, along with APOCALYPSE
NOW, is the very real sensation that you have just lived through something.
There are images and emotions that will stick with you for the rest of your
life.
     FULL METAL JACKET is a filmic experience.  A skilled director communicates
ideas which cannot be conveyed in any other medium.  This is not a narrative
film so much as an intense slice-of-life work.  FULL METAL JACKET sets itself
apart from other Vietnam films from the very start as the characters and the
audience are first put through boot camp.  Dark humor and the patent absurdity
of the filthy-mouthed Gunnery Sergeant make for lots of laughs.  But the film
takes sudden turns into the deadly serious nature of the job at hand.  As cruel
as the basic training appears, you can see it getting results.  I was exhausted
by the graduation scene, and I now understand better than ever before just how
those deep bonds of brotherhood are forged between soldiers.
     The action switches to Vietnam at the time of the Tet Offensive.  Our
protagonist, played by Mathew Modine, is working for the STARS AND STRIPES
newspaper.  He itches to see some action at the front.  Then the VC bring some
action right to the front gate of his base at Da Nang.  We follow him into the
most convincing and frightening war-torn city I've ever seen.  The climactic
scene is not the usual "big battle" (a temptation that befell even PLATOON),
but a chilling encounter with a sniper.  Throughout the film I felt the
helplessness of the characters who were swept up in a war they tried to
understand but could not.
     More than any war film I can recall, FULL METAL JACKET shows how truly
complex war can be, and how one could arrive at the conclusion that the only
way to avoid a moral dilemma is to become amoral.  It is a wringing emotional
experience tempered by Kubrick's black humor and unerring eye for detail.  Make
no mistake, this is a rough film with verbal obscenities and blood by the
bucketload.  I am usually insulted and offended by screenplays which attempt to
cover bankrupt dialogue with four-letter words, but this is the film where such
language is mandatory.  The script was written with a good ear for the slang of
the time and place.  Get a sitter for the kids and head for the theatre.

Title
Review for Fly II, The (1989)
[And yet another "bug" review--isd this a trend? -Moderator]
     David Cronenberg's remake of THE FLY is a tough act to follow.  Chris
Walas, who did the creature effects, had some big shoes to fill when he stepped
in as the director of THE FLY II.  Imagine my surprise to find that the sequel
is actually pretty good.
     Walas pretty much assumes that you've seen the previous film.  If you
haven't, go out and rent it first.  I'm not spoiling much by revealing that
this story centers on Martin Brundle, son of Seth Brundle (Brundlefly?).  He is
raised by Mr. Bartok, of Bartok Industries (read: Big Evil Corporation, one of
the trite, formula things about the story that the movie none the less manages
to overcome) and his scientific henchpersons.  Due to young Martin's unique
parentage, his growth is rather accelerated.  In fact, by the time he's five
years old he looks like Eric Stolz.
     Martin learns very quickly.  He has to.  Besides taking over his father's
work on teleportation, he learns lessons about love and deceit which set the
stage for the retribution finale -- an ending quite unlike that of THE FLY.
The philosophy in this movie isn't as deep as its original, but Stolz'
performance is almost in the same league as Goldblum's -- which is a very good
league indeed.
     Walas displays a very fine visual sense in this film.  Even the parts that
are hard to look at are pretty in their way, if you know what I mean.  My guess
is that, as a first-time director, Walas made "Coverage" his middle name and
shot tons of footage.  The edited result moves along at a very quick pace.
Even the drawn out scenes required in this sort of film are shorter than I've
ever seen them.  I enjoyed the editorial style of the movie, even if a couple
of scenes seemed to show up too quickly.  It all fit with Martin's character in
the end.
     The best way to see this film is in a theatre with lots of young women.
There's something about their screams that really rounds out the sound track.
That should warn you that when an effects man takes over, there are lots of
effects.  Mind you, they're very, very good.  One or two of them were
gratuitous messages to other effects men, but by and large they serve the story
well.  If you are particularly susceptible to goop and glop you should either
stay away or plan on watching a lot with your eyes closed.
     THE FLY II isn't for everybody, but if you think it might be your cup of
tea you should check it out.

Title
Review for Dead Ringers (1988)
     David Cronenberg doesn't make "easy" films.  He made the best ever Stephen
King movie, THE DEAD ZONE, and THE FLY was one of the best films of 1986.  The
latter was, in many circles, maligned or simply ignored just because it was a
"horror" film.  Hmph.  Beneath the goo, glop and prosthetics was a
psychological thriller.  Now Cronenberg brings us DEAD RINGERS, a pure
psycho-thriller.  He proves that what *really* frightens you is in your mind,
not your eye.
     Steve Upstill observed that this film shows a whole new level of maturity
for Cronenberg.  His direction is deft, sure and polished.  There isn't a note
out of place.  His sense of visual style, so striking in THE FLY, has evolved
into a subtle, strong support for the story.  While giving Jeff Goldblum and
Jeremy Irons the tremendous credit that is their due, I cannot help but wonder
if it's entirely a coincidence that they each turned in such amazing
performances under the same director.
     Irons is simply drop-dead stunning in his dual role as the Mantle twins.
Beverly and Eliot are brilliant gynecologists with a successful fertility
clinic.  They are identical twins; so identical that they can share everything:
patients, business appointments, and women.  Irons, who you may remember from
THE MISSION, has such a firm grasp of these complex characters that you can
often tell within the first few seconds of a scene which twin is which.  Aided
by a seamless, perfectly-executed motion control split-screen system -- and by
Cronenberg -- Irons does work worthy of the *two* Academy Awards for which he
should be nominated.  By the end of the film it's difficult to think of him as
just one man.  He is supported by the always fabulous Genevieve Bujold, in her
role as the infertile, promiscuous actress.
     You've noticed by now that I haven't talked about the story.  That's
because I hate spoilers in reviews.  Let me just encourage you to go to what is
a strong contender for my top ten list this year.  But let me do it with a
warning:  DEAD RINGERS is an intense psychological experience.  It is
disturbing and tragic.  Nobody can give you the creeps like Cronenberg.  There
are images and feelings which will stay with you for quite a while.  If you
insist on leaving the theatre singing a merry song you should steer clear.  If
you like being engrossed, awed, repulsed, frightened and skillfully manipulated
then make tracks to the movie house.

Title
Review for Midnight Run (1988)
     The other day I rented Brian DePalma's 1986 organized crime comedy WISE
GUYS.  It was worse than this DePalma fan thought a DePalma film could be.  So
it was with some trepidation that I went to see yet another Mafia-style buddy
film: MIDNIGHT RUN.  Perhaps the contrast accounts for why I so thoroughly
enjoyed the latter.
     There is nothing particularly new about pitting two opposites against each
other, having a cross-country chase, or dodging the FBI and the mob.  MIDNIGHT
RUN transcends the formula with a well-crafted script and terrific acting on
the parts of the lead characters.  I was never a big fan of Charles Grodin
until I saw him hold his own with Robert DeNiro.  The chemistry between these
two actors really works, and they are so compelling that they practically carry
the film.  Fortunately they are backed up by a fine supporting cast featuring
some of the dumbest and meanest mobsters ever, with Dennis Farina as the
latter.  Yaphet Koto gets in some good licks as the harried FBI special agent.
     Martin Brest also gets credit for his taught direction.  This film is a
real balancing act between comedy, drama, and action picture.  Just when things
might tip too far in one direction everything comes swinging back.  And, as
Steve Upstill pointed out at the theatre, there are at least four times during
the film where you ask yourself "How on *earth* will they get out of this
one?"  As outlandish as the answer often is, the film works well enough to let
you willingly suspend disbelief.
     MIDNIGHT RUN is certainly worth seeing, and it's actually worth seeing on
the big screen, the better to appreciate Rob Hahn's fine camera operation.

Title
Review for RoboCop (1987)
     Yo!  What a summer we're having!  If you can't find a movie to jazz you
this year then you were weaned on a pickle.  And just when I though 1987 had
peaked, enter ROBOCOP.  Remember how STAR WARS combined a lot of things you had
seen before into something you'd never seen before?  This is like that in
several ways.  Imagine combining almost every neat science fiction premise in
the galaxy with "The Six-Million-Dollar Dirty Buckaroo Terminator."
     Peter Weller, also known to his fans as Buckaroo Banzai, is perfectly cast
in the title role.  After being brutally shotgunned by a gang of ruthless thugs
he is rebuilt as Robocop, the cyborg policeman of the future.  Rob Bottin's
design and execution of the Robocop character is as stylish and flawless as the
devil he made for LEGEND.  But Weller must be credited with bringing him to
life in a deft performance as the man-machine.
     The action is wretched excess.  The only real mistake with the movie was
making the violence so graphic that it requires an R rating.  It could have
been made as a PG-13 so that kids could go.  I hate to have anybody miss the
romping, comic book feel and the witty dialogue.
     This is a movie that rises above itself by not taking itself too
seriously.  I love the way it cuts back and forth between the story and
television of the future.  Some of the commercials and news stories are a riot.
They also form a part of director Paul Verhoeven's convincing and complete
vision of a future world dominated by large, bumbling corporations.
     Plant your tongue firmly in your cheek, fasten your seatbelt, and hang on
to that tub of popcorn.  ROBOCOP is going to take you on the ride of the
summer.

Title
Review for Sea of Love (1989)
     SEA OF LOVE is a thriller that never seems to get into overdrive in spite
of fine performances by the principals.  It's not a bad film; indeed so much
about it is good that it pales mainly in comparison with the film it could have
been.
     Al Pacino stars as a twenty-year veteran detective investigating a series
of execution-style murders.  John Goodman joins him in a two-man task force
when the murders spread to his precinct.  Ellen Barkin plays of woman Pacino
meets and falls in love with during the course of his investigation.  All three
actors are proven, reliable performers with lots of presence, and they deliver.
     I had some trouble buying Barkin's attraction to Pacino's character
because he spends most of the movie in various states of drunkenness.  But
Barkin's dangerous good looks are used to great advantage in this film, and she
does at least convince me that she falls deep in lust.  Whatever the quality of
the chemistry, there was a lot of it, even if it was in an alcohol solution.
Goodman delivers his usual engaging and natural performance in his supporting
role.
     There are enjoyable aspects to the editing as we are spared some of the
obligatory scenes one comes to expect in this genre.  The way the film jumps
forward in time at just the right moments is refreshing.  The comic relief is
well-placed and springs naturally from the performances.  That's the good news.
Somehow SEA OF LOVE lacks the kind of edge needed in a thriller like this.  The
surprise ending provides the desired shock, but then leaves a disappointing
after-taste.
     One thing that lured me to the theatre was the fact that SEA OF LOVE
opened on three of the best screens in the Bay Area.  Must be pretty, I
thought.  The print I saw had some of the worst color timing I've ever seen in
a modern feature film.  The colors had a sickly green cast, which could be the
printer's fault, but most of the lighting seemed rather un-inspired, which is
no doubt the Director of Photography's fault.
     The fact that I was thinking about things like the hair in the gate and
the quality of the print is a good indication that I wasn't swallowed up in the
tension.  That may be fine for some films, but it's a real problem for a
thriller.  If you're a fan of Pacino, Barkin or Goodman (or all three, as in my
case) feel free to go enjoy their work.  If you want another experience like
FATAL ATTRACTION or JAGGED EDGE, save your money.

Title
Review for Out of Rosenheim (1988)
     European directors seem to be fascinated with the American desert.  After
all, there is nothing like it in Europe.  German director Percy Adlon came to
America and made BAGDAD CAFE.  There's been nothing like it on the screen
before.
     This off-center gem discovers what happens when a corpulent German
tourist, played by Marianne Sagebrecht, breaks up with her husband in the
desert of Southern California.  She wanders into the Bagdad Oil and Gas Cafe,
and into the lives of a ill-tempered woman, played beautifully by CCH Pounder,
and her bizarre extended family.  The only name you'll recognize is Jack
Palance as the weird old painter from Hollywood.  Other members of the
menagerie include a tattoo artist who is very popular with the truck drivers, a
son with a bent for classical piano, a daughter who comes and goes with an
assortment of lowlife men, and a boomerang-throwing backpacker.
     BAGDAD CAFE is a film that grows on you.  My relationship with the film
paralleled the relationship of the two women.  At first I hated it.  It started
out so badly that I thought they accidentally projected the second reel first.
Starting abruptly, it was full of gratuitously tilted cameras, staccato edits
and mumbled German.  Oh, brother.  How did I get talked into watching this
movie?
     The first ray of hope was the haunting theme music and a memorable image
of the woman entranced by eerie lights in the sky.  Before I was aware, Brenda,
the slovenly cafe owner, had been won over by the genuine and compulsively neat
Jasmine.  So had I.  Through a series of whimsical and strange vignettes BAGDAD
CAFE worked its magic.  By the end of the movie I was completely hooked.
     This is not mainstream, belly-laugh comedy, but I will be smiling or
laughing about some of the images for a long time.  BAGDAD CAFE is a must-see
for devotees of the off-beat.  If you think a movie just isn't a comedy if it
doesn't have Eddie Murphy in it, stay home.  If, on the other hand, you still
remember scenes from CHOOSE ME or TROUBLE IN MIND you better search this one
out.  Island Pictures, bless them, is distributing, but I don't know how wide a
release BAGDAD CAFE will get.  I hope it comes to a theatre near you.

Title
Review for Sirens (1994)
     Okay, let's get this first part out of the way.  Yes, Elle
Macpherson appears nude in SIRENS.  Starkers.  Rumor has it that she
gained a little weight for the part.  Yes, she looks fabulous.  There's
much better news about this new film from Australia, however.  Not the
least of which is that Elle turns out to be a rather natural,
unaffected actress.  She may be one of the happy few fashion models to
successfully make the transition to the big screen.  I suppose we'll
know after she gets some other parts to play.
     SIRENS is the story of a young cleric and his wife on their way to
an assignment in Australia who are asked by the Church to stop by the
remote home of an artist.  The artist's paintings of nudes, which range
from the silly to the profane, have caused a bit of a stir, and the
vicar has the task of convincing the painter to withdraw the more
objectionable works and replace them with something more in line with
the taste of the public and, of course, the Church.
     I'm a bit of two minds on SIRENS, because the movie and I have
wildly divergent ideas on what sort of things will strengthen or weaken
a marriage.  But there is so much good in the movie, I'll concentrate
on that.  The greatest strength is a cast of characters who all feel
like real, thinking, feeling human beings.  The story is subtle, but
deftly told, and set with a good sense of place.
     It would have been easy to take the cheap route in a movie which
contains so much nudity, and it would have been easy to take cheap
shots at religion by making the vicar a twit or a close-minded prude.
Instead, we witness the rare treat of a lively, passionate discussion
between him and the painter in which each make valid points, leaving us
to feel that it is indeed possible for reasonable men to disagree.
     SIRENS doesn't shy away from allegory, and the artist's Australian
retreat is at once an Eden repleat with serpents, and a rocky shore
awaiting the ships of sailors bewitched by the song of the Sirens.  In
an interesting turn, it is the vicar's wife, and not the vicar, who
ends up with the most pronounced character arc.  Perhaps, as so long
ago in Eden, Eve leads the way to a new life, one fraught with perils
but filled with new kinds of joy.

Title
Review for Space Jam (1996)
Here I was, all pumped up in my best Gomez Addams "Let's watch a train
wreck" mood, and all "Space Jam" could deliver was a fender bender. No,
it couldn't deliver the kind of down-in-flames badfilm experience of a
"Star Trek V", "Hudson Hawk" or "1941". Instead it's just a humorless,
overdesigned and underscripted bowl of soggy Wheaties, breakfast of
champions. Imagine a movie in which Bill Murray isn't funny.
Well, that's not quite true. Bill did get me to laugh once with his
line right after Michael Jordan gets sucked down a golf hole. But by
the end of the movie I couldn't remember the line anymore.
I'm not going to blame Jordan for being a bad actor. As an actor I'm no
better, and if someone dangles that kind of pay check in front of me
I'll do "Space Jam II". Besides, even though pro athletes are
professional entertainers, we wouldn't be too hard on Placido Domingo
or even Kenny G.  if it turned out they couldn't play basketball in the
NBA. And asking Jordan to carry a movie is every bit as absurd. No,
Michael walks away from this pretty unscathed.
It's the Warner Bros studio which needs to hang its corporate head in
shame.  If there were laws in the world of art, what they did to their
own legacy would be a felony. Someone really needs to send them a
telegram and let them know that Mel Blanc is dead. None of the voices,
except Tweedy and a couple of mice, came anywhere within the ballpark
of the old classics. Worse, none of the animation can hold a candle to
them.
The character design of the new characters is so unreadable and
indistinct that it makes Don Bluth's work look like the Renaissance.
The style of the staging is straight TV generation garbage: Extreme
angles and manic movement with absolutely no sense of character. Not
once did I think that any of the animated characters was thinking.
Rather, they were yanked around by a vacuous script which could only
have been written by a committee of ten year olds. At several points in
the show we glimpse clips of the old Warner Brothers shorts. I had the
same reaction to them as to the baker's dozen of "homages" in ID4: "Are
you *sure* you want to be reminding me of what a *good* movie is like
right now?"
Not only did they not understand their own short films, but in their
headlong rush to throw money on the screen they lost the whole conceit
of their "Who Framed Roger Rabbit" -- uh -- homage. When we get into
Loony Tune Land or whatever the heck it was called, Bugs and the gang
are running around with fancy pseudo-3D tone mattes on them. Shouldn't
they only look like that in the "3D woild" as Bugs calls it? Oh, well.
This is just the tip of a frustrating iceberg which waits anybody who
sets sail in a sea of thought anywhere near this movie.
And speaking of money, where *did* it go? I know that animation is
expensive, but for half the price of the rumored budget of $140 million
they could have done some good computer graphics instead of those
inflated balloon guy effects which can surely be done by teenagers on
home computers these days.
So if you were hoping for either a good movie or one that was so bad it
was good, save your money and see "The English Patient" or rent "Star
Trek V", respectively.

Title
Review for Nightmare on Elm Street 3: Dream Warriors, A (1987)
     Yes, the inimitable Freddy Kroeger is back in NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET PART
III: THE DREAM WARRIORS.  In addition to the awkward title the latest nightmare
from Wes Craven has a few flaws.  The Girl from the first film is back, and
can't act her way through wet tissue.  But her acting is so bad that it begins
to grow on you by the end of the film.  The only other real problem is that the
wires show once or twice too often.
     If you agree that the "Nightmare on Elm Street" series is the OUT OF
AFRICA of slasher films, the CASABLANCA of dead teenager flicks, then you'll
enjoy this trilogy-defining sequel.  Besides learning more about Freddy's
genealogy, physiology and ontogeny, we are treated to an almost endless stream
of imaginative effects.  I mean the practical effects and stop-motion animation
are well executed and just plain fun.  Freddy's incarnation as a television set
(with an enjoyable cameo by Dick Cavett and Eva Gabor), and the tongue-spouting
seductress, were particularly original.  I was also impressed with the clay and
skeletal animation.
     Don't worry that it's formula.  You should *enjoy* the formula.  For THE
DREAM WARRIORS they pull in almost every snatch of ghostie-ghoulie lore in
moviedom except thunderstorms and oak stakes.  Bad acting, stilted dialogue,
shaky plot and all it's still worth seeing, especially in a big room full of
screaming adolescent females.  The person I saw it with liked it better than
Part II, while I think I liked Part II just a little more.  That should give
you a pretty good idea where it rates.

Title
Review for Stargate (1994)
     Like many others, I ate up the trailers for "Stargate" in
anticipation if its release.  As soon as it opened, I saw it at one of
the biggest theatres in town.  The good news is that the movie
delivered everything it promised to me in the trailers.  It's big, art
directed to the hilt, has some stunning effects, and crowd scenes like
we haven't seen since, well, DUNE.  The bad news is--that's all it
delivered.
     The story is pretty basic and mindless.  That makes it just a
little better than most "Star Trek" movies and TV episodes.  But that's
damning with faint praise.  Remember, though, that the trailer never
promised a Merchant/Ivory film.
     On some levels the movie works quite well.  It does a pretty good
job at the hand-waving technobabble that is seemingly so necessary in
science fiction, and resists the temptation to over-explain the
technology.  That, coupled with the stunning look, would be enough to
convey the impression of a relatively intelligent film were it not for
a few glaring stupidities.
     The first thing is the "military" mission--led by Kurt
Russell--which is accompanied by rogue Egyptologist James Spader
on the journey through the stargate.  This has to be the most
*un*-military bunch of guys I've seen since "F-Troop."  Except for
packing along some nice guns and remembering to say "over" at the end
of most of their radio transmissions, this little pack acts nothing
like any group who ever donned a uniform for real, much less the crack
Special Forces one would expect to find on this mission.
     And, very minor spoiler here, you know things aren't going well in
the script department when, because of the medallion he's wearing,
Spader is mistaken for a diety by the natives.  My, I certainly didn't
see *that* one coming.
     Also along for the slow, ponderous ride is Jaye Davidson who wears
some simply fabulous outfits in his role as Ra, the sun god.
Ironically, he looks more feminine in his kingly garb than he ever did
in drag in THE CRYING GAME.  He doesn't get to do much more than pose,
though, and his voice is replaced with a heavily processed growl that
is at times hard to understand.
     There's an audience for STARGATE: people who, like me, catch it
on a matinee and with low expectations, or kids who are still enjoying
the "gee whiz" stage of life.  That audience is likely too small for it
to recoup the rumored $55 million budget, and I'm only sorry that they
didn't pare it down to $54 million to have some more money to spend on
the script.

Title
Review for Beetlejuice (1988)
     Did you know that people who commit suicide become civil servants in the
afterlife?  Do you know how to pronounce "Betelgeuse"?  You would if You had
seen BEETLEJUICE, the latest from Tim Burton.  If you saw PEE WEE'S BIG
ADVENTURE just try to picture a feature full of Large Marge characters and
you'll be close.  But this is in many ways more like Burton's wonderful short
"Vincent" than PEE WEE was.
     In fact, this is more like Tim Burton than his last feature.  PEE WEE'S
BIG ADVENTURE was Tim Burton at the service of Paul Reubens, while BEETLEJUICE
is Tim Burton at the service of Tim Burton.  For that reason I can recommend
this movie to people who liked PEE WEE, and also to those who hated it.  It's
the same in the right ways and different in the right ways.  Confused?  I'll
make it simple: BEETLEJUICE is a much better film.
     John Lasseter, one of Burton's classmates at Cal Arts, once said that
being a film director could be a waste of Tim's talents as a designer.  I'm
happy to say that his inventive, playful, slightly dark sense of design is a
major asset of the movie.  Another asset is the premise:  A newlydead couple
haunting their New England home want to frighten off the neurotic New Yorkers
who move in down stairs.  The trouble is they aren't very good at it.  How they
get help is the crux of the movie, and I won't spoil any of it for you.
     BEETLEJUICE is funny, well-crafted and features a wonderful cast.  Even
without Michael Keaton's manic-oppressive performance you'd have your money's
worth, so when he does appear it's a real bonus.  All but the most
nightmare-prone tots should get a kick out of the movie.  If they weren't
scared by Large Marge they'll be fine.  A big part of the fun is that Burton
delivers plenty of adult humor while still delivering enough good physical
comedy to keep the kiddies in giggles.  Now we just need to get the Academy to
create a special award for Best Use of a Harry Belafonte Album in a Motion
Picture Soundtrack...

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
Tim Burton has clout. That's obvious because he was allowed to make
"Mars Attacks", a hilarious, no-punches-pulled comedy spectacle. I'm
glad that Burton now has that kind of clout, and that technology has
pretty well caught up with his vision.
>From the opening images I was hooked. These are flying saucers the way
flying saucers are *supposed* to look. And there are the right number
of them -- finally! ILM has delivered both Martians and effects big
time: I mean both quality and quantity. The animation of the Martians
is, in many places, the finest character animation ILM has ever done.
And Burton has delivered a fun set of characters in the form of an
all-star cast.
Nobody is spared. Everybody is lampooned. From the opportunistic
President, mugged to a fare-thee-well by a gleeful Jack Nicholson, to
the Newage (rhymes with sewage) pyramid-and-crystal bimbo burbled by
Anette Bening, to the hawkish general emoted by Rod Steiger, everybody
gets a jab.
I don't want to go into any detail here, but I do want you to go see
the movie. There are images (and sounds, thanks to Randy Thom's design
work) which I confidently predict you will not forget. Heavens, *I* nearly
forgot Danny Elfman's inspired, theremin-rich score. And some gags
that work on a truly grand scale. Oh -- and gags you won't believe they
took *that* far. In short, it delivers everything the bloated and
ultimately lame "Independence Day" should have, plus a lot of belly
laughs in the process.

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
     I haven't had this kind of fun at a movie since RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK
It's not that BATMAN is anything like that film, but my emotional reaction was
similar.  There's nothing quite like seeing a big film with an opening-night
crowd at a big theatre.  The crowd and I ate it up.
     Tim Burton gets a lot of credit for the outstanding design work, and also
for staying in control of his players.  A project of this size has buried many
a good man, and just ending up alive, let alone triumphant, is a worthy
accomplishment.  Burton doesn't talk down to the audience or spoon- feed plot
points to us.  My faith in animators as directors is stronger than it's ever
been.
     The look of BATMAN is pure eye candy.  This is some of the best art
direction I've ever seen.  It's on par with that of BRAZIL and BLADE RUNNER.
Shot after shot I found myself opening my eyes wide, just trying to drink it
all in.  Books are stories told with words, and movies are stories told with
pictures.  The pictures in this movie are poetry.  There are images I'm never
going to get out of my head -- and I don't want to try.
     Michael Keaton, in whom I had doubts, was dead on target as Bruce Wayne.
The risk Burton took with this controversial bit of casting paid off in spades.
I actually bought Wayne as a playboy millionaire -- with some very serious
emotional problems bubbling below the surface.  The emotional scars of the
event that warped young Bruce are clearly present even before the details are
revealed in the film.  (Comic book readers know what that event is already).
     As Batman, Wayne doesn't so much take on another personality as he buries
his own.  He becomes almost more machine than man, as I could reasonably expect
from someone who felt compelled to put on a costume to fight crime.  Batman
isn't so much a good guy as he is an anti-bad guy.  Revenge, of the calculated
sort, is clearly one of his major motivators.  Another motivator is style.  I
think one of the keys to the Batman character's success is that we all secretly
wish we could do what he does.  Who wouldn't want to fight evil using awesome,
intimidating aesthetics and superior technology as weapons?  Face it.  Being
Batman could be way cool.
     Jack Nicholson triumphs as the other side of the same coin: The Joker.  He
manages to do three things which I might have thought mutually exclusive, any
one of which is difficult for even good actors to achieve.  First, he is right
out on the edge without losing control.  Compared to The Joker, his character in
THE SHINING was a calm, trustworthy and compassionate soul.  Second, he is
genuinely funny.  He not only gets all the best lines, he  makes jokes with his
body language.  Third, and particularly impressive in combination with number
two, he is viciously, maliciously, deeply evil.  I mean that given the choice
between spending time with The Joker and hanging out with Frank Booth (BLUE
VELVET) I'd be at Frank's place with bells on.
     One of the happiest accidents to befall the production was Sean Young's
broken leg.  I think Kim Basinger did a much better job than Young would have
as Vicki Vale.  I'm very much enjoying the current trend away from dumb women
in movies.  Vale is, of course, a mere mortal (there is, after all, room for
only one super hero in this movie) but an intelligent one.  She may need
rescuing now and then, but she's quite capable of helping.  While slightly
bothered at first by her relationship with Bruce Wayne, I came to realize how
important it was to knowing Bruce's character and providing a window into his
emotions.  It also never hurts to have someone to rescue.  I think a key to
Batman can be found by paying attention to who else he rescues in the film.
     I must also single out the editor for some praise.  The pace is taut,
shocking or flowing depending on what is needed.  Some of the scene transitions
are a real gas.  In spite of Prince's somewhat disappointing songs, which are
fortunately only a tiny part of the movie, the music is satisfying and
supportive of the action.  In typical Tim Burton fashion, some off-the-wall
music adds spice to a few key sequences.  One of The Joker's henchmen carries
around a boom box which plays everything from Prince to an elevator arrangement
of "Beautiful Dreamer."
     The Batmobile and Batplane, which are mercifully never called such in the
film, are stunning.  Burton has a talent for mixing the right amount of cartoon
physics into his live action, and he applies it well to both the vehicles and
other key shots.  The sense of motion in BATMAN is clearly born of animation,
and that's a very good thing.
     I know they were nervous, but I've got to hand it to the execs at Warner
Brothers for even allowing this film to get made.  It is not the sort of thing
one expects from Hollywood these days.  I can only dream of the day when Terry
Gilliam gets the kind of support Tim Burton has managed to muster.  The studio
bigwigs can relax now.  BATMAN is going to be pulling down the bucks by the
bucket.  See it soon.  See it with a big crowd.

Title
Review for Parenthood (1989)
     The promotional campaign for PARENTHOOD would have you believe that it's a
light-weight comedy about yuppies and their puppies.  While it does have many,
many funny moments, it is also about the kind of exquisite pain and
embarrassment you can only feel as a parent, child, sibling, or spouse.
PARENTHOOD is a movie that wants it both ways.  The good news is that it
succeeds.
     Easily director Ron Howard's best film yet, bouquets also go to the fine
cast and the clever, sensitive writing.  PARENTHOOD deals deftly with a large
cast, providing a panoramic look at several generations of a family.  Just when
you think a character is going to be a cliche, they do something unexpected as
their humanity shows through.  And just when you think a sequence or situation
is going to be tied up in a neat television bow, in flies a twist right out of
reality's quiver.
     Unless you were born on another planet you will find yourself identifying
with at least a few of the characters and their situations.  And you'll care
about the rest of them.  I'm not a baseball fan at all.  It's not that I
dislike it, but that it reminds me of watching paint dry.  But I've never cared
so much about the outcome of a movie sports event as I did about the Big Play
in the Little League game.  The boy who plays Steve Martin's eight-year-old son
evokes such a deep sense of child terror and loneliness that I cared about
*everything* that happened to him.
     PARENTHOOD is an adult film about being a child, and a childlike film
about being adults.  The giddy heights and hurtful depths of human
relationships make it a delightful roller-coaster ride.  Do yourself a favor
and see it.

Title
Review for Timecop (1994)
     The destination of tonight's BNO (Boys Night Out) was TIMECOP, the
latest Charles Van Damme vehicle.  I don't believe I have ever seen a
duller action picture in my life.  When I saw Peter Hyams' name on the
credits, I knew that a) the depiction of technology would be incredibly
stupid, b) the politics would be both stupid and Politically Correct,
and c) there would be a terrific chase sequence somewhere in the
movie.  Well, two out of three ain't bad.
     Time-travel movies, as a genre, present many plotting challenges.
One may either face the Grandfather Paradox and turn it into a
brilliant twist, as in BILL AND TED'S EXCELLENT ADVENTURE, or one may
turn tail and fall tumbling through plot holes the size of the Grand
Canyon.  With Van Damme's leaden acting as ballast, TIMECOP takes the
plunge straight down into mind-numbing boredom.
     A good stupid movie, such as SPEED is said to be enjoyable if you
just "shut down your brain" for a while.  While watching TIMECOP I had
to go way past any higher brain functions and was starting to shut down
the autonomic systems.  It didn't help.  I was down to just respiration
and a heartbeat, and the movie *still* didn't make any sense.  Should
you have the misfortune to actually see this film, don't even *think*
about engaging your brain during the period between the end of the film
and when it vanishes from your memory (a very dangerous five minutes)
because you'll probably strip a gear and need a tow truck for your
head.
     The production design is probably the funniest thing about the
film.  The "futuristic" cars look like old Fords that had been attacked
by a High School art class armed with lots of Tupperware and glue.  The
computer effects might have been impressive had the producers found a
way to transport the film back in time some ten years, but today they
make nearly as dull a thud as Van Damme's acting.  It's not all his
fault, though.  Hyams may not know how to shoot a martial arts
sequence, but at least he can make a gratuitous sex scene look like it
was accidentally cut in from a completely different movie.  And he
never did deliver that chase scene.
     By now, some readers are thinking, or hoping, that this is a
"good" bad movie.  Wrong.  This isn't so-bad-it's-funny.  It's just
lay-there-and-stink bad.  TIMECOP is a time-travel movie which
succeeded only in making my watch stop for a couple of hours.

Title
Review for Cool World (1992)
     COOL WORLD is the latest effort from Ralph Bakshi, the man who
directed such seminal works as FRITZ THE CAT, WIZARDS, and THE LORD OF
THE RINGS.  One thing you can say for Ralph is that his directorial
style reflects his own personality.  Trying to hold a conversation with
Bakshi has been likened to listening to someone spin the tuning dial on
a radio.
     This movie has all the continuity of a fever dream.  It's a
confused mish-mash of random, poorly-animated mayhem and wholesale
rotoscope over occasionally stunning background paintings.  The primary
appeal this film would seem to have is to the kind of desperate,
hormone-ravaged teens who are sorry that Jessica Rabbit never appeared
nude in PLAYBOY.  While the over-rendered Holli Would never doffs her
skimpies, Ralph compensates by peppering the film with plenty of
scatological references.  "Subtle" is not in this man's vocabulary.
     Just because the movie is dreadful doesn't mean there aren't a few
good moments.  Some of the animation, especially at the end of the film,
is quite good -- maybe about two minutes total -- and the large
background paintings in Cool World are way cool.  A pleasant surprise
was that Kim Basinger actually makes a very professional voice actress
(well, given the limitations of the character).
     The trouble is that none of the actors are given anything to work
with.  There is nothing to explain what any of them are doing.  There
are no consistent rules governing the interaction between the 'Noids of
the real world and the Doodles of the "cool world."  Isolated bits of
dialogue float in and out of focus while completely random acts of
cartoon violence fill the foreground.  COOL WORLD is one non-sequitur
after another.  The endless references to classic animated films,
especially FANTASIA, only succeed in making you wonder why you paid real
money to sit in the theatre.
     If you insist on seeing this movie, you probably will laugh several
times.  Some of those times may even be when Ralph wanted you to (there
is a hilarious scene with a cute bunny shooting craps).  But, if any of
COOL WORLD survives in your memory, it'll likely leave a taste in your
mouth to remind you of the last time you ate a whole jumbo bag of pork
rinds.

Title
Review for Hudson Hawk (1991)
     I went to see HUDSON HAWK tonight in a generally good mood and with
what I thought were reasonably low expectations.  Instead of an escapist
romp a la DIE HARD, I got a confused, needlessly bloody, overblown
episode of THE PINK PANTHER MEETS THE THREE STOOGES.  At several points
during the movie I felt genuine embarrassment for the cast: not a good
sign.  I guess seeing names like Bruce Willis, Danny Aielo and Andie
MacDowell got my hopes up too far.
     The director competes with the script for title of Least Aware of
Where We're Going.  On one level, the film wants to be a witty,
hard-edged caper film about a cat burglar forced out of retirement by
agents of the government, the mob and what was supposed to pass for some
kind of goofy corporation.  But the foul language and blood clash badly
with the tongue-in-cheek, cartoony level of reality it tries to set up.
     The overall impression is of a movie made by some marketing droid
using a color by numbers set.  Some of the individual characters in
individual scenes are, or are potentially, funny.  And the first half of
the movie almost sets up an air of mystery capable of maintaining our
attention.  But as soon as you find out who Everybody is, it runs down
hill -- and it started on just a little knoll.  We wind up with a
mish-mash of cloying dialogue, weak repartee and broadly-drawn
characters.  The film film wanders aimlessly through a world where the
Pope watches "Mr. Ed" in dubbed Italian, and a decapitation is just a
setup for a one-liner, and one that feels forced at that.
     The whole movie feels forced, and events are driven entirely at the
convenience of the plot rather than by any sense of an internal logic.
If you're really curious about it, or a die hard Bruce Willis fan, wait
for video.  It'll be a short wait, I promise.

Title
Review for Hairspray (1988)
     The death of Divine was made all the more untimely by his two-err de farce
performances as both the bad guy and the heroine's hefty mother in HAIRSPRAY.
While the young actress who plays his daughter is frighteningly good in her
role, Divine dominates and sets the tone for one of the most enjoyably silly
movies I've seen in ages.
     Director John Waters serves up what may be the best 1962 movie ever made.
This is what I call "Hang Ten" filmmaking: many of the scenes are right out on
the edge without tripping over themselves.  The soundtrack is easily the finest
of its genre: it's impossible to tell which idiotic novelty numbers were
written for the film and which were genuine Sixties issue.
     The art direction, repleat with 65,536 colors not found in nature,
compliments the bright, saturated photography.  Some (Some? Try most!) of the
wardrobe in this film will have you simultaneously laughing and reaching for
the Dramamine.  If you manage to retain your higher brain functions while
slapping your knee, you just may notice a surprising amount of depth (I mean in
the film, not the hairdos).  While many movies shoot themselves in the foot
trying to deliver The Message, ignoring Sam Goldwyn's advice about Western
Union, HAIRSPRAY deftly pokes fun at The Message and still manages to deliver
it.  Of course, there isn't a moment of doubt about where the film's sympathies
lay.  It just doesn't go overboard in that department.
     The greatest strength of the film is the casting.  It's perfect.  I mean
there isn't a character out of place anywhere.  Besides the formidable presence
of the late Divine, we have Jerry Stiller as his husband, Sonny Bono and Debbie
Harry as the White parents of The Spoiled Brat, and Pia Zadora (in her best
performance *ever*) with Rick Ocasek in a cameo.  Even Waters himself shows up
as the technically up-to-date psychiatrist.  He has described this group as a
"dream cast", and explained that you don't ask for a Sonny Bono *type*, you ask
for Sonny Bono.
     The budget for HAIRSPRAY may be high for John Waters, but he clearly
knows his craft well enough to deliver a lot of bang (and hairspray) for the
buck.  If you have any memory at all of beehives, cars with fins, or line
dances then by all means check this out.  If you choose not to see HAIRSPRAY
the Council will see it as a character flaw and not let you in the club.

Title
Review for Mariachi, El (1992)
     I'm truly sorry I don't have time to compose a full-fledged review
of EL MARIACHI, but I want to at least spread some good buzz about
the movie.  By now everybody knows that it was shot for $7,000 and has
launched the first-time director's Hollywood career.
     EL MARIACHI is a simple action story, well-told and with well-
drawn characters. It has a fresh appeal which struck me as BLOOD SIMPLE
meets THE OUTLAW--JOSEY WALES meets THE GODS MUST BE CRAZY. It seems to
stand as a shining example of how a small budget can be a help, and not
a hindrance, to a film maker.
     Were I to offer a Hollywood job to this film maker, it would
probably be as an editor. It's not that his directing isn't natural and
assured, but I think it's the cutting that really makes EL MARIACHI.
The film also captures very faithfully the look and feel of a small
Mexican town. This is clearly an insider's view, and not some Art
Director's idea of what Mexico might look like. This is the real
thing.
     The English subtitles are plenty good enough for any semi-literate
American to be able to enjoy the film, but if you happen to understand
Spanish you'll enjoy another level of clever (but not overly-clever)
dialogue. If you think you'd enjoy a simple, fresh change of pace film
with no actors you can recognize, go out of your way to catch EL
MARIACHI.

Title
Review for Siesta (1987)
     I just love it when this happens.  I went to see SIESTA mostly because I
didn't know a thing about it, other than what the poster said (which wasn't
much).  I soon realized that I had either seen a review of it on the telly or a
trailer, but I had forgotten anything said about it.  So there I am watching
the opening titles, and names start to roll by: Martin Sheen, Ellen Barkin,
Grace Jones, Isabella Rosellini, Jody Foster.  Jody Foster?  Yup.
     A name I didn't recognize was Mary Lambert, the director.  Starting with a
strange, stunning opening sequence she starts telling a story by inter-cutting
with flashbacks.  Barkin wakes up outdoors wearing nothing but a red dress.
She finds somebody's blood all over it, and then realizes that she's lying at
the foot of a runway.  Things get rolling when she finds that she's in another
country with no money, passport, nor idea how she got there.  She gradually
starts to remember things via flashbacks which parallel what's happening to
her.  She meets some very strange people and has some very strange things
happen to her.  None of them seem as strange as the stunt she was planning--to
free-fall from an airplane into a burning net.  You see, she's the strangest
character in the film.  Barkin, who didn't do that much for me somehow in THE
BIG EASY, plays wonderfully all the way from An Eyeful down to a wretched
mess as her character gets deeper and deeper into the nightmare.
     Steamy, sardonic, slightly disorienting, SIESTA is almost impossible to
pigeonhole.  That's my favorite thing about it.  It belongs in the slightly
off-center bin with films such as TROUBLE IN MIND and AFTER HOURS, except
toward the side of the bin with THE STUNTMAN in it.  The slightly over-the-top
dialogue seems strained at the beginning of the film, but perfectly natural by
the end.  Some of the scene transitions are really brilliant.  Lambert leaves
no doubt that she knows how to direct.
     I love stumbling across a "find" like this.  SIESTA is a horse of a
different color.  It may not achieve a great commercial success, but if you
like off-the-wall, well-crafted movies as well as I do, you should check it
out.

Title
Review for Far and Away (1992)
     By now nearly everybody has heard that Ron Howard's FAR AND AWAY is
the first film to be shot in 70mm in nearly twenty years.  I'm happy to
report that it looks wonderful (if you don't see this in 70mm you'll be
sorry).  I'm even happier to report that the gorgeous cinematography is
completely at the service of the story.
     FAR AND AWAY gets of to a bit of a slow start, but by the time the
action moves from Ireland to Boston and the second act kicks in it
really works.  The last act is nearly all done literally on the run.  I
saw the film in a sleep-deprived state and it kept me awake, alert and
interested all the way through.
     Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman each turn in excellent performances.
Cruise infuses his character with real fire once the script catches up
with him in Boston.  Kidman gets the more interesting role of the
character who goes through the most changes, and she's equal to it.
They both create thinking, feeling, believable characters who fall in
love on the way to their dreams.  The screenwriting and direction show
respect for our intelligence as they let the love story play out almost
entirely in the subtext, a most refreshing thing in a world of
how-about-breakfast-and-what-was-your-name-again movies.
     Their physical attraction is clear, but then who wouldn't be
attracted to people who look like Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman?  By
bypassing the nearly requisite and quite misnamed "love" scene Hollywood
loves to dish out when writers don't want to think, Howard, Cruise and
Kidman deliver the much more romantic and interesting process of two
people learning to love each other in spite of, and at times because of,
their faults and differences.  The love story is woven through the
process of reaching the Oklahoma land rush, and the independence that
owning land represents.  Just like so many real people, they
occasionally lose sight of the goal and get sidetracked.  As strong
characters, the conflict only makes them stronger.
     Howard's direction also delivers humor, action, and a world peopled
by desperate eccentrics.  His America of the late Nineteenth Century is
at once welcoming and frightening, dangerous and full of promise.  The
casting is good all around, and fans of "Hill Street Blues" should get a
particular kick out of Nicole Kidman's screen parents.  FAR AND AWAY is
a film which, if you are at all interested in seeing, should be seen on
the biggest screen and in the best theatre you can find.

Title
Review for Raising Cain (1992)
     When Brian DePalma finished making RAISING CAIN he must have sat
bolt upright in a cold sweat and thought it was a nightmare.  He used
that conceit over and over and over and over again in the film until the
audience wished *they* could wake up and find that it was all a dream.
No such luck.
     It's as though DePalma took bits and pieces of every film he's ever
made, good and bad, and tossed them into some kind of giant celluloid
blender.  RAISING CAIN is so awash in red herrings, dream sequences, and
magic pop-up characters that it's no wonder it took three editors to cut
it.  At least Brian isn't peppering his films with just Hitchcock
references: now he's making references to his own films.  
     I guess John Lithgow just couldn't turn down the opportunity to
play himself, his evil twin, his own father, a woman and a small boy.
Would you?  His performance is all that saves the few good sequences in
the movie.  One of the two times that the audience at our screening sat
quietly at attention can be attributed to his acting.  And Lolita
Davidovich's face is what saves the best close-ups.
     But this is the movie that puts the "osterous" in "preposterous."
While on the one hand DePalma's script and direction try to keep the
audience "guessing" and "off-balance" about parts of the story, the rest
is incessantly explained by characters whose sole reason for existence
seems to be spouting exposition during marathon-length SteadiCam shots.
The result is an audience that is "confused" and "annoyed."  For a while
I tried to let it work as a comedy.  Lithgow provides some good laughs,
and so does DePalma, but I think only one of them did it on purpose.
     I'm an optimist.  So I say that some day, some how, Brian is going
to come to his senses.  He's going to realize that, by golly, he's made
more good movies than many directors ever do in their careers, just not
lately.  He's going to get rid of whatever evil twin it is that made
RAISING CAIN, and rediscover the mature, skilled film maker responsible
for THE UNTOUCHABLES.  Until then, I can only shout...

Title
Review for Butcher's Wife, The (1991)
     THE BUTCHER'S WIFE is a romantic film based on the age-old conflict
between heart and head.  What isn't so old is the intriguingly-
structured plot which drops Demi Moore, as the butcher's wife, as a
pebble into a pond of characters.  She plays a clairvoyant who simply
tries to be helpful as she "sees what others want sometimes before they
know themselves."
     The pond is Greenwich Village in New York, and her innocence and
caring combine with her vision to instantly touch the hearts of a group
of people whose heads are all messed up.  The ripples in the pond
reflect back onto their psychiatrist, played by Jeff Daniels.  The main
conflict of the film then becomes that between the scientist and the
clairvoyant.  And so, naturally, does the main love story.
     But the cagey script also swirls with the interwoven love stories
of a dowdy music teacher, a soap opera actress, a shop keeper and a
teenage boy -- all of whom are Jeff Daniel's patients -- and of course
the butcher.  Following the advice of the butcher's wife feels right at
first and seems to make them all happy.  Then they find that it has
turned their world topsy-turvy.  Daniels' character winds up confused
and shaken to his core, and even Moore's character finds out something
about herself that she never suspected.  Since this is a romantic
comedy, after all, I'm spoiling nothing by telling you that it all works
out in the end , but the way and the speed with which the stories all
resolve is satisfying and sometimes surprising (in fact, this must be
about the shortest third act in modern film).
     Even if Demi Moore's accent doesn't quite hold up, the movie sure
does.  THE BUTCHER'S WIFE may not change your life, but go see it if you
want to spend some time with some engaging characters and enjoyable
performances.  And just in case you find yourself put off by the way
off-base reviews of a couple of guys from Chicago, let me quote the
butcher's wife herself: "What I say and what people hear aren't always
the same thing."

Title
Review for Who Framed Roger Rabbit (1988)
     Wednesday evening I stood in line at the newly restored Alhambra Theatre
in San Francisco.  (Here's a trend I hope catches on: the theatre used to be
split in two, but now it's back to being one large room the way theatres are
*supposed* to be!)  I was at the head of a long line -- a very long line.
Opening night audiences are the best in the world, especially when the movie is
An Event.
     And what an event it turned out to be.  WHO FRAMED ROGER RABBIT (always
sans question mark) is a landmark film.  Technically it is as big a
breakthrough as STAR WARS, and there are precious few movies I've enjoyed as
much as this one.  Now, I like to think of myself as reasonably well up on the
state of the art in visual effects and, to a respectable degree, in the state
of the art in animation.  Roger proved to me that I don't know nuthin'.
     The animation, as John Lasseter pointed out, is the kind of animation
animators dream of doing: this is real animator's animation.  In nearly every
shot they go out of their way to show off.  Most of it is so flawless that
animation neophytes will never guess how hard it was to do.  But they will
enjoy it just the same.  How could you not enjoy a piano duet with Donald and
Daffy Duck?  How could you not enjoy seeing nearly every great animated
character ever created working together in one film?  (I could tell you more
about characters which get applause for just showing up, but I'm bound and
determined not to put any spoilers in this review.)
     Industrial Light and Magic, especially the optical department, deserves a
zillion simoleans and a basket of joy buzzers for their work on this film.  I
particularly hope that Ed Jones gets a little statue for the "tone mattes" used
to give the animated characters so much dimensionality.  The optical crew
composited 1,050 shots, as compared with just over 600 for RETURN OF THE JEDI.
Bear in mind that they pulled this off simultaneously with doing WILLOW.  Those
guys are superhuman, suicidal, or both.
     Do not, I repeat -- do *not* -- show up late for this film.  If it starts
while you are at the candy counter, forget the imitation popcorn and bits of
sticky chewy stuff and run into the theatre.  The first several minutes contain
some of the best (and hardest) animation ever done.  While the animation is
pedal-to-the-metal during the whole movie, one standout sequence is also the
most subdued.  Jessica Rabbit, Roger's wife, delivers a knock-out torch song at
the Ink and Paint club in a sequence which is a cinematic tour de force.  (Amy
Irving did the vocal performance for the scene, and I didn't know she could
sing!)
     As if the animation weren't enough reason to go see the movie, and don't
you think it ought to be, Robert "Back to the Future" Zemekis serves up his
finest work ever.  The same layered, detailed approach he took to the world of
1955 is applied to 1947.  For example, there are no cartoon characters in the
movie predating that year except for the penguins from MARY POPPINS, but
they're working as waiters.  The best part of his direction for me is his sense
of kinetics.  The timing, the pace, the movement of everything is darn near
perfect, from the way scenes are cut to the way props move.
     Bob Hoskins is absolutely dead-on as the drunk, has-been private eye Eddie
Valiant who is caught up in a murder mystery.  His ability to act with
characters that aren't there yet is stunning.  This is "effects acting" at its
finest.  If he isn't remembered at Oscar time then the Academy is a bigger
bunch of maroons than even I thought.  The supporting cast, almost half of
which is human, is also very good.  Christopher Lloyd is wonderfully evil as the
dread Judge Doom.  Joanna Cassidy, as Valiant's lady friend, holds her own even
though she can be seen at least once biting her lip to keep from laughing.
     Don't *you* try that or you'll need stitches in your lip.  Listen.  Log
out now and head for the theatre.  Expect long lines.  Word of mouth on this
film is going to be incredible.  See it in a theatre with a big audience --
it's a terrific audience participation film.  Of course, there is so much going
on, and the laughter is so frequent that you'll have to go see it again and
again to catch what you missed the first time.

Title
Review for Killer Klowns from Outer Space (1988)
     Last night I spotted an unusual title on the "horror" rack of my
neighborhood video rental place, and decided to give it a whirl.  KILLER KLOWNS
FROM OUTER SPACE turns out to be a real kick.  It's really much more than you'd
expect from a low budget horror/comedy.
     The Chiodo brothers serve up some original, eye-catching art direction in
this wonderfully twisted flesh-eating aliens story.  The character design of
the malevolent bozos is a hoot.  I like the spacecraft that looks just like a
circus tent.  I like the gun that shoots popcorn.  I like the cotton candy
cocoons in which they encase their victims.
     Sure the acting is bad.  So's a lot of the dialogue.  (Although I do like
the line the punk in jail gets after watching an incarcerated klown dispatch a
pesky cop: "So.  What're you in for?")  The important thing is that what little
money there was went into the right places.  The pace is pretty good once it
gets going, and the whole thing seems remarkably fresh.  A lot of imagination
went into figuring out new ways for the grotesque gang to take their victims.
And you get all of this in a PG-13 package with no nudity and no buckets of
blood.  KILLER kLOWNS FROM OUTER SPACE is rather refreshing, in its own
perverse way.

Title
Review for Masters of the Universe (1987)
     MASTERS OF THE UNIVERSE is, without a doubt, the finest movie based upon a
line of toys that I have ever seen.  While you digest what that means, let me
go on in more detail.
     A curious mix of low-budget production techniques and high-tech Richard
Edlund effects, the film comes off sort of like a production in search of a
story.  The director was apparently distracted by the logistics of the rather
ambitious effects, and the actors seem to have been left more or less on their
own.  Dolph Lungren has very little to do as He-Man but flex.  Billy Barty, who
still looks like Billy Barty even under a lot of very good makeup appliances,
has little to do but provide the regularly scheduled comic relief.
     Frank Langella, as the evil Skeletor, manages to rise above the material.
He is practically buried under his skull-like makeup, (which holds up
impressively well under long, tight shots), and still manages to command every
scene he's in.  Another high point is the casting of Meg Foster as Evil-Lyn
(can you believe these names?) who is best when she just uses those amazing
eyes of hers on the camera.
     If you are enough of a special effects freak to subscribe to CINEFEX then
you might want to see the film for some of Edlund's more imaginative sequences.
Otherwise you should probably stay away unless dragged there by your kids.
Beware before bringing the kinder: in a bone-headed move, they have a police
character who says things like "Holy sh*t."  In a kid's movie?  Who was manning
the bridge that day?  That, along with the laser whip scene (one of the niftier
effects), probably got them their PG rating.  I give it $2.00 on a scale of
$5.00.

Title
Review for Arrival, The (1996)
This year I'm in a real Summer Movie Mood. I saw "Twister" on opening
night. I saw "Mission: Impossible" on the night of the "sneak". I'm
looking forward to ID4, "The Eraser" and even "The Rock". Heck, I'm
even going to go see "Dragonheart". Both "Twister" and "M:I" were fun
in their own right, as long as I was in a forgiving mood, which I was.
This weekend I ran out to see a film about which I knew practically
nothing. I went with my same easy-going summer movie attitude.
And then "The Arrival" turned out to be such a pleasant surprize that I
realized I didn't have to cut it so much slack. This is a tightly
scripted Sci-Fi thriller which is every bit as effective as "The Thing"
or "Invasion of the Body Snatchers" albeit for subtly different
reasons. The best surprize in the movie? It was the fact that there
were surprizes!  At least three times during the film I said, "Now I
did not see *that* coming". The next best surprize?  That it remains
true to itself and does not degenerate into an action picture in the
third act. No fist fight. No snappy one liners after killing someone.
Wow.
Being science fiction it does, of course, take a few liberties with
physics and technology. But it only does so when it needs to, and
always at the service of the story. It's not at a Larry Niven level of
accuracy, but compared to any "Star Trek" episode it comes off like a
physics textbook. The effects range from adequate to stunning. The most
important thing about them is that they always serve the story. I guess
that makes "The Arrival" the "Anti-Twister".
By now you've noticed that I'm being pretty vague about the content of
the movie. That's because I had the pleasure of seeing it "cold", and
I'd like you to have the same. If I even tell you the *kind* of
surprizes it holds in store, I could ruin some of the fun for you. I
will say that the performances are engaging, especially in the case of
Charlie Sheen. Screenwriter David Twohy slips into the director's chair
for the first time (not counting one TV movie) and proves that he has
some seriously good chops.
If you haven't seen "Twister" and "Mission Impossible" yet, skip them
until later. Do yourself a favor and catch "The Arrival" instead.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Finally: A big, effects-laden summer movie that is actually worth the
time and the $7.50 to go see. "Men In Black" takes precise aim at its
target and scores a bullseye. It almost unfailingly hits the right tone
and the right character moments throughout. Vincent D'Onofrio should
get an Oscar nomination. Tommy Lee Jones plays it straight. Will Smith
isn't annoying. About the only cast member not used to her potential is
Linda Fiorentino. A quibble.
While certainly no "Chinatown", the script (yes, there actually was
one) shows clear evidence of thought on the part of the writers. In
case the writers or producers of the summer's other megaduds are
reading, I'll repeat those strange words slowly so they can sound them
out: "S-c-r-i-p-t". "T-h-o-u-g-h-t."
Refreshingly free of forced one-liners, we are instead treated to
exchanges with some actual wit.
The production design by Bo Welch ("Batman Returns", "Edward
Scissorhands", "Wolf") is deliciously good. The cinematography by
Donald Peterman ("Get Shorty", "Point Break", "Flashdance") under Barry
Sonnenfeld's direction is both clear and energetic.
A great part of the fun is that the movie manages to both skewer
blockbuster summer movies and be a blockbuster summer movie. My dad
taught me as a kid that the best riders at the rodeo were always the
clowns. You have to be good at something to poke fun of it.
"Men In Black" is a welcome relief for those who thought they'd have to
wait for Oscar season before having fun at the movies.

Title
Review for Spaceballs (1987)
     Gary Rydstrom, the talented sound designer who did "Luxo Jr." for us, told
me about his plans to record some laughing children for our next film.  He said
it was going to be easy to make the whole day care center giggle: just say
"underpants."  I can't help but feel that Mel Brooks is just as easy to amuse.
The best part of the dull HISTORY OF THE WORLD PART I was the trailer for JEWS
IN SPACE.  I had hopes that SPACEBALLS would live up to that promise.
     Naaa.  This STAR WARS parody is mostly wee-wee poo-poo jokes.  Mind you,
there are some very funny bits and I did laugh out loud several times.  Rick
Moranis is hilarious as Dark Helmet, and John Candy has some choice moments.
There are flashes of comic genius which can almost make you believe this film
was made by the same man who brought you YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN.  One measure of a
movie is how far you get from the theatre before thinking about something else.
I couldn't think about anything but THE UNTOUCHABLES for a week after seeing
it, but SPACEBALLS barely made it to the parking lot.
     I can't send anybody out of their way to see this one.  If you are an avid
Brooks fan (or someone who laughs whenever you hear "underpants"), go right
ahead.  Or better yet wait for home video.  It shouldn't be a long wait.  If
you do see it I'm sure you'll at least enjoy the sound design.  Gary Rydstrom
worked on SPACEBALLS too.

Title
Review for Beyond the Valley of the Dolls (1970)
     I recently had the--um--opportunity to see BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE
DOLLS at the Pacific Film Archive in Berkeley.  Among the odiferous genre
known as Badfilm this one stands out as a pungent weed: a film that is
skillfully bad.
     Imagine all the worst of the late Sixties (the film was made in the early
Seventies) strained through a Hollywood point of view and sliced like a
microtome sample right through the silliest parts.  Roger Ebert's screenplay is
a brilliant hodge-podge of paisley psycho-babble and psychedelic cliche.  I'm
convinced that he knew exactly what he was doing with the improbable and
wandering story of an all-girl rock group called "The Carrie Nations" (with
approximately six talents between them if you get my drift and I think you do).
I have serious doubts whether the director, Russ Meyer, knew what was going on
and it's clear that the actors hadn't a clue.
     Meyer, known for his soft-core photography of callimastian women of truly
heroic proportions, had impressed the studio with his "Vixens" film which
grossed tens of millions for a $600,000 outlay.  When he got his big budget to
make BVD (which has absolutely nothing to do with the VALLEY OF THE DOLLS
film/book by Jacqueline Suzanne), he ran right out and hired a schlock director
of photography and a kid from Chicago to write it.
     At least Ebert saw his chance.  I have a clear mental picture of him at
his typewriter:  Tap, tap, tap, and then roll on the floor with laughter.  I'm
sure he wondered if anybody would deliver the lines with straight faces.  As it
turned out, very little genuine emotion of any kind appears on any faces during
the film.  I still marvel at how several conversations were carried on without
saying one sentence in intelligible English.  ("This is my scene and it freaks
me out.")  Also telling is the searing accusation by an establishment lawyer:
"She has been living with three other people.  One of them is a man, and...,"
he turns, points a finger for dramatic effect, and emphasizes, "...the other
two are *women*!"
     I could go on and on.  The movie goes on and on.  And on.  And on.  Like a
bad symphony it keeps ending.  I counted four complete, distinct endings.  One
is an Eddie Wood-like voice over recounting the sins and lessons to be learned
of each character in the film.  By this point I realized that the film was not
merely an exercise in excess and bad taste, but a shaggy dog.  See it if you
think you can stand it.  It's a real education in how outrageous boredom can
be.

Title
Review for Living Daylights, The (1987)
     After the last Bond flick I thought that 007 was dead.  The plot had
become metastasized with silliness, and Roger Moore was beginning to creak.
The rumors about Pierce Brosnan confirmed that the movies were about to descend
into terminal foppishness.  The long-running series of James Bond adventures
were going out with a whimper.
     I'm happy to report that they are back with a bang.  Timothy Dalton, in
THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS, is the best Bond in years.  The proportion of intrigue to
action and gadgetry to romance has been restored to proper order.  For the
first time in ages we have a Bond who is about the right age, and who is
willing to get his hands dirty.
     The scope of this movie, and the amazing action sequences, are in the same
league as RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK.  It had to have helped that they used an Ian
Fleming short story as the foundation, because the plot has as many twists as
the mountain road in the opening gag.  And even though I never bought her for
an instant as a cellist, Maryam d'Abo, the latest Bond Girl, has to get credit
for some of the best scenery in the movie.  She makes a beautiful and innocent
foil for Dalton's patient, competent, and yet fallible Bond.
     THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS is certainly worth the $5.50 I paid to see it, and I
suspect that the capacity crowd with me opening night felt the same.  Gosh,
this has been a fun summer.

Title
Review for Hoffa (1992)
     This weekend turned into a Jack Nicholson/J. T. Walsh Film Festival
for me.  I saw HOFFA on Christmas night, and I just got back from seeing
A FEW GOOD MEN.  If all you want is a horse race, then it's A FEW GOOD
MEN by a length.
     I'm ambivalent about HOFFA.  I'm still impressed with DeVito the
director, and all the performances are good.  It's obvious that Jaaaack
relished his role.  The production is well mounted, and the scope is
broad.  Mamet's dialogue is his usual combination of genius and
expletives.  But HOFFA faces the same challenge as films such as THE
GODFATHER and GOODFELLAS: to make us care about people who are
criminals and creeps.  The Godfather films all succeeded.  For me,
GOODFELLAS failed.  I put HOFFA somewhere in the middle.  I came away
with the feeling that I was now fairly knowledgeable about someone who is
still somewhat of an enigma.
     The film is told in flashbacks and has a mostly chronological
structure.  The mere chronicling of Jimmy Hoffa's career is almost
enough enough structure for a story.  Almost.  HOFFA isn't so much a
story as it is a biography.  And while the film didn't try to whitewash
the man, I sensed some sort of misplaced admiration for him.  Perhaps
that was simply the primary symptom of its failure.  But it is a good
movie, and people who liked BUGSY and GOODFELLAS will probably enjoy
it.
     I'm happy to report after seeing his latest that Rob Reiner's
stunning track record as a director is unsullied.  Everybody connected
with A FEW GOOD MEN delivers, and nobody disappoints.  The performances
by Cruise, Moore, and Nicholson reminded me just why they are big name
stars.  Cruise's disarming performance allows us to watch an
intelligent, if at first slothful, character in the process of thinking,
and Moore proves that she's not just the pretty girl who can cry on cue.
Jack's part in A FEW GOOD MEN is smaller in screen time than in HOFFA,
but he practically *is* the third act.  This is a solid *story*, and
Cruise's character walks away a much different man than the one at the
start of the film.  
     If you still haven't figured out the J. T. Walsh reference, it's
because he has supporting roles in both films.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
The robot is always right: "Danger! Danger, Will Robinson!"
>From the spectacularly poorly-designed opening action sequence to the
unaware self-parody of the closing credits, "Lost In Space" is
spectacularly, almost hilariously, bad.
It's not just that writer Akiva Goldsman has proved beyond the shadow
of a doubt that he is a moron (as if the two last "Batman" films
weren't damning enough). It's that the movie isn't even really a movie.
It's a package, apparently designed to strip-mine a goofy yet loveable
old TV show and regurgitate it as a... I don't know what... designed to
appeal to adolescents. (A friend reports that his 13-year-old daughter
enjoyed it.)
I would heartily recommend this film, yes recommend, to any and all
film students and lovers of the cinema. Why? Because it's a veritable
textbook on how *not* to make a movie. Do you have a 2.35 frame to use?
Then be sure to cram the camera in so tight that the audience is
gasping for breath!  Don't forget to cut randomly in a way guaranteed
to break the audience's eye fix! In fact, everything that happens on
the unnamed "planet of random screen direction" is a "How Not To" of
staging and editing. Brilliant!
But let's get back to what is laughingly referred to as the "script".
Lesson number one: Make everybody talk just like the robot. I mean,
there's a certain charm in having him speak his own exposition: "Crush,
Kill Destroy!". But every single character in the movie talks like
this, albeit with a few more articles of speech. And, to make sure
nobody misses a single thought, the Penny character delivers her
exposition as little soliloquies into a wrist recorder that shows up on
our screen as "Penny Vision".  I'm sure that Goldsman's idea of
"subtext" is that thing on the bottom of the screen that lets other
people understand Italian movies.
What merit there may have been in the effects is effectively destroyed
by over-designed and poorly-considered shot layouts and the appearance
of the most embarassingly bad CG character I've ever seen in a modern
movie. And the camera work? Apparently the director saw a "lookat
camera" on someone's workstation and fell in love with it. This is the
crudest kind of CG camera in which the view is locked to a point in
space or, in this case, a point on a CG character. The effect is to
lock that one thing in space, and the camera changes it's view in exact
synch with the character. It's something you use when doing tests or
modeling, but it's not the way real cameras work. The way it's used in
this movie is absurd.
As the energetically banal "update" of the theme song started over the
credits, my mind's eye (obviously desparate for some sort of coherent
image) conjured up Leonard Pinth-Garnell, from the old days at SNL. He
took a slow drag on his smoke, turned to the camera and gleemed,
"Deliciously bad."
I recommend it as a matinee, as long as you go in costume as either
Crow or Tom Servo.

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
     TRUE LIES owes as much, if not more, to James Bond films as it
does to pure action films such as COMMANDO.  Director James Cameron and
star Arnold Schwarzennegger are each confident and at the top of their
form as they over-deliver the goods in a deft cross between a 007
adventure and an action comedy.  Its not a stretch to say that they
have created a Bond for the 90's, and Pierce Brosnan better pray that
this movie is well forgotten before his attempt at Bond hits the
screen.
     Speaking of praying, Tom Arnold should be spending a good part of
each day genuflecting in the direction of James Cameron's house,
thanking him for saving his career.  One of the most pleasant surprises
in a movie full of them was that Arnold (Tom, that is) was able to play
an engaging character who you really wanted to like for his wit and his
puppy-dog loyalty almost enough to make you overlook his neanderthal
attitudes toward women.  I actually enjoyed the time he spent on the
screen.
     TRUE LIES has at its heart a terrific premise.  What if James Bond
had a house in the suburbs, and his wife and daughter had no idea what
he really did for a living? Suppose further that he were to learn that
his wife was being wooed by a spook wannabe who hoped to score by
providing the sense of adventure missing from her dull life? Its hard
to save the world and still be home in time for dinner.
     Seated behind us at the sneak preview were a couple of guys who
had this exchange during the credits:
     Facetious as it sounds, beneath all of the sound and fury, Cameron
does manage to deliver a love story between Arnold (Schwarzennegger,
that is) and Jamie Lee.  At first infuriated by her affair, he becomes
obsessed, then cruel, and then she puts him in his place.  Meanwhile
there is some great business between Arnold and the fake spy, Bill
Paxton.  Paxton is so deliciously slimy that you almost wish he had
more screen time.
     But screen time is not wasted in TRUE LIES.  This is skilled, deft
filmmaking.  There aren't scenes that don't need to be there, and many
scenes do double duty.  Single-minded focus comes into play only in the
well-crafted and thrilling action sequences.  And there are plenty of
them, ranging from the category of stunts I call "Things I've always
wanted to do" to set pieces which escalate in unexpected directions in
the "take it farther" school of comedy.  During the climactic sequence
at the end of the movie I started to wonder why my jaw was sore.  Then
I realized that I had been clenching my teeth for the past several
minutes.
     TRUE LIES is audacious, tight, and--most of all--great fun.  Like
any Cameron film, it is also big and loud, so treat yourself and catch
it at the best theatre you can.

Title
Review for Adventures of Baron Munchausen, The (1988)
     THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN caps Terry Gilliam's trilogy begun with
TIME BANDITS (the escape of the boy) and BRAZIL (the escape of the man).  The
Baron represents, among other things, the escape of the old man.  This film is
so packed with images and ideas that I hardly know where to begin.
     The story is set in the late 17th Century, the dawn of the "Age of
Reason."  A city is under attack by the Turks, and a small troupe of actors is
performing "The Adventures of Baron Munchausen" -- who is the protagonist of
European legends and folk tales.  An old man enters the shelled-out theatre and
proclaims himself the *real* Baron Munchausen.  No one believes him except for
a young girl.
     The Baron starts to tell his story, and the line between fact and fiction
stretches to the breaking point.  He and the girl embark on a bizarre quest to
re-unite the amazing Baron with his equally amazing servants: the strongest man
in the world, the fastest man in the world, a dwarf with amazing hearing and
the ability to create gale-force winds from his lungs, and a marksman capable
of seeing -- and hitting -- a bulls-eye from half way around the world.
     The sheer scale and audacity of MUNCHAUSEN is tremendous.  Gilliam has the
amazing ability to make metaphors, legends and gods literally walk and talk.
Any one of a dozen sequences from this film could have been the climax of any
ordinary movie and still been enough to make it a good one.  Gilliam has
combined a child's sensibility, thousands of years of myth, and his own
formidable genius and vision into a truly fantastic film.  His ability to pack
the frame with new ideas and minute details to build a consistent and wonderful
world was very evident in BRAZIL, but now with MUNCHAUSEN he has eclipsed
himself.
     The imagination at work here makes THE WIZARD OF OZ seem cautious and
PINNOCHIO appear plausible.  There are many levels to this film, but I think
that THE ADVENTURES OF BARON MUNCHAUSEN is primarily the story of romance
versus reason, of imagination versus science, and of fantasy versus fact.  And
romance, imagination and fantasy win triumphantly.
     If this isn't the best movie of 1989 it will have been a very, very good
year indeed.
